Washington statutes.
RCW 19.77.050

Duration of certificate—Renewal—Fees—Rules.

Registration of a trademark hereunder shall be effective for a term of five years from the date of registration. Upon application filed within six months prior to the expiration of such term, on a form to be furnished by the secretary of state requiring all the allegations of an application for original registration, the registration may be renewed for successive terms of five years as to the goods or services for which the trademark is still in use in this state. A renewal fee as set by rule by the secretary of state, payable to the secretary of state, shall accompany each application for renewal of the registration.

The secretary of state shall notify registrants of trademarks hereunder or their agents for service of record with the secretary of state of the necessity of renewal within the year, but not less than six months, next preceding the expiration of the unexpired original or renewed term by writing to the last known address of the registrants or their agents according to the files of the secretary of state. Neither the secretary of state's failure to notify a registrant nor the registrant's nonreceipt of a notice under this section shall extend the term of a registration or excuse the registrant's failure to renew a registration.

[ 2003 c 34 s 3; 1994 c 60 s 3; 1989 c 72 s 5; 1982 c 35 s 182; 1955 c 211 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.